Connecticut, session 2026, HB05466.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) The chairpersons of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to commerce shall convene a working group to study
and make recommendations concerning the angel investor tax credit
program established pursuant to section 12-704d of the general statutes.
Such study shall include, but need not be limited to, a review of the audit
summary completed by the Auditors of Public Accounts on Connecticut
Innovations, Incorporated's administration of the angel investor tax
credit program for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2022, and June 20,
2023.
(b) The working group shall consist of, but need not be limited to, the
following members:
(1) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to commerce, or their designees;
LCO No. 2727 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5466
(2) The chief executive officer of Connecticut Innovations,
Incorporated, or the chief executive officer's designee;
(3) The Commissioner of Economic and Community Development,
or the commissioner's designee; and
(4) Any additional members, as deemed necessary by the
chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to commerce.
(c) The chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to commerce shall
schedule the first meeting of the working group, which shall be held not
later than sixty days after the effective date of this section.
(d) The members of the working group shall select two
cochairpersons from among the members of the working group.
(e) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to commerce
shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
report on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to commerce, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes. The working group shall terminate on the date
that it submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section